Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-10-101,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-10-101. A. The Oklahoma Commission on Children and
Youth shall establish the Oklahoma Mentoring Children of
Incarcerated Parents Program.
B. The purpose of the Oklahoma Mentoring Children of
Incarcerated Parents Program is to provide effective intervention
services through one-to-one mentoring relationships to children of
incarcerated parents who either:
1. Are in the custody of the Office of Juvenile Affairs and
currently placed outside the home; or

2. Have been identified by the Office of Juvenile Affairs as
and to children at risk of becoming involved in the juvenile justice
system.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-10-102,
as amended by Section 11, Chapter 347, O.S.L. 2024 (10A O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 2-10-102), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-10-102. 1. A. The Oklahoma Commission on Children
and Youth shall issue a request for proposals on or before July 1,
2024, and July 1 of every third year thereafter for which the
Oklahoma Mentoring Children of Incarcerated Parents Program is
funded, seeking applications to administer the Oklahoma Mentoring
Children of Incarcerated Parents Program.
2. B. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
work in conjunction with the Commission to coordinate a competitive
bid process.
3. C. The Commission, in coordination with the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services, shall review the applications
for compliance with the established requirements.
4. D. Entities eligible to submit applications to administer
the Oklahoma Mentoring Children of Incarcerated Parents Program
shall be limited to nonprofit organizations or programs which are
exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of Section 501
(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 501 (c)(3)
and which otherwise meet the requirements set forth in paragraph 5
subsection E of this section.
5. E. The Commission may approve an application that meets the
requirements set forth in this subsection and as established by the
Commission. The approved applicant or applicants shall provide one-
to-one mentoring services to children of incarcerated parents who
are in the custody of the Office of Juvenile Affairs and currently
placed outside the home, or have been identified by the Office of
Juvenile Affairs as and to children at risk of becoming involved in
the juvenile justice system. The selected applicant or applicants
shall:
a. currently serve
1. Serve youth ages 6-18,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3849 Page 2

b. have six (6) through eighteen (18);
2. Have a statewide or regional presence,
c. currently provide one-to-one;
3. Provide mentoring services to children of incarcerated
parents,
d. have;
4. Have served children of incarcerated parents for five (5)
three (3) years or more,
e. have;
5. Have rigorous volunteer application and screening processes,
f. have;
6. Have established child safety policies and procedures,
g. measure;
7. Measure performance outcomes via multiple tools,
h. have five (5);
8. Have three (3) years or more of performance outcome data,
i. provide;
9. Provide ongoing safety training and diversity training for
program staff,
j. have an established working relationship with the
Office of Juvenile Affairs,
k. set;
10. Set match-retention-rate goals,
l. have; and
11. Have experience working with high-risk populations, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3849 Page 3

m. deliver contracted services at a cost no greater than
One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per
mentor-mentee match.
6. On or before July 1, 2012, and each July 1 thereafter for
which the Oklahoma Mentoring Children of Incarcerated Parents
Program is funded, the Office of Juvenile Affairs may forward
applications that the Office of Juvenile Affairs has determined meet
the requirements of this section to the Commission.
F. On or before November 1, 2012 2024, and each November every
third year thereafter for which the Oklahoma Mentoring Children of
Incarcerated Parents Program is funded, the Commission shall award,
through a competitive bid process, one a grant to one applicant to
provide one-to-one or grants for the purpose of providing mentoring
services to children of incarcerated parents who either are in the
custody of the Office of Juvenile Affairs and currently placed
outside the home or have been identified by the Office of Juvenile
Affairs as and to children at risk of becoming involved in the
juvenile justice system.
7. In addition to the grant funding, the Commission shall be
authorized to provide other appropriate assistance to the selected
applicant.
8. G. The Commission shall be authorized to promulgate rules
and establish procedures necessary to implement the provisions of
this act.
9. H. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
work with the Commission to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3849 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3849 Page 5